dictionaries/sk_SK/sk_SK.aff
SFX R Y 399
SFX R   rať         riem       [aeiou]rať
SFX R   rať         rieš       [aeiou]rať
SFX R   rať         rie        [aeiou]rať
SFX R   rať         rieme      [aeiou]rať
SFX R   rať         riete      [aeiou]rať
SFX R   rať         rú         [aeiou]rať
SFX R   rať         rúc        [aeiou]rať
SFX R   rať         r          [aeiou]rať
SFX R   rať         rme        [aeiou]rať
SFX R   rať         rte        [aeiou]rať
SFX R   rať         eriem      [^aeiou]rať
SFX R   rať         erieš      [^aeiou]rať
SFX R   rať         erie       [^aeiou]rať
SFX R   rať         erieme     [^aeiou]rať
SFX R   rať         eriete     [^aeiou]rať
SFX R   rať         erú        [^aeiou]rať
SFX R   rať         erúc       [^aeiou]rať
SFX R   rať         er         [^aeiou]rať
SFX R   rať         erme       [^aeiou]rať
SFX R   rať         erte       [^aeiou]rať
SFX R   ďať         dím        ďať
SFX R   ďať         díš        ďať
SFX R   ďať         dí         ďať
SFX R   ďať         díme       ďať
SFX R   ďať         díte       ďať
SFX R   ďať         dia        ďať
SFX R   ďať         diac       ďať
SFX R   ďať         di         ďať
SFX R   ďať         dime       ďať
SFX R   ďať         dite       ďať
SFX R   ňať         ním        ňať
SFX R   ňať         níš        ňať
SFX R   ňať         ní         ňať
SFX R   ňať         níme       ňať
SFX R   ňať         níte       ňať
SFX R   ňať         nia        ňať
SFX R   ňať         niac       ňať
SFX R   ňať         ň          ňať
SFX R   ňať         ňme        ňať
SFX R   ňať         ňte        ňať
SFX R   ťať         tím        ťať
SFX R   ťať         tíš        ťať
SFX R   ťať         tí         ťať
SFX R   ťať         tíme       ťať
SFX R   ťať         títe       ťať
SFX R   ťať         tia        ťať
SFX R   ťať         tiac       ťať
SFX R   ťať         ti         ťať
SFX R   ťať         time       ťať
SFX R   ťať         tite       ťať
SFX R   ať          ím         [^ďňrť]ať
SFX R   ať          íš         [^ďňrť]ať
SFX R   ať          í          [^ďňrť]ať
SFX R   ať          íme        [^ďňrť]ať
SFX R   ať          íte        [^ďňrť]ať
SFX R   ať          ia         [^ďňrť]ať
SFX R   ať          iac        [^ďňrť]ať
SFX R   žať         ž          žať
SFX R   ať          me         [^ďňrť]ať
SFX R   ať          te         [^ďňrť]ať
SFX R   ať          al         ať
SFX R   ať          ala        ať
SFX R   ať          alo        ať
SFX R   ať          ali        ať
SFX R   iecť        ečiem      iecť
SFX R   iecť        ečieš      iecť
SFX R   iecť        ečie       iecť
SFX R   iecť        ečieme     iecť
SFX R   iecť        ečiete     iecť
SFX R   iecť        ečú        iecť
SFX R   iecť        ečúc       iecť
SFX R   iecť        eč         iecť
SFX R   iecť        ečme       iecť
SFX R   iecť        ečte       iecť
SFX R   cť          kol        iecť
SFX R   cť          kla        iecť
SFX R   cť          klo        iecť
SFX R   cť          kli        iecť
SFX R   ĺcť         lčiem      ĺcť
SFX R   ĺcť         lčieš      ĺcť
SFX R   ĺcť         lčie       ĺcť
SFX R   ĺcť         lčieme     ĺcť
SFX R   ĺcť         lčiete     ĺcť
SFX R   ĺcť         lčú        ĺcť
SFX R   ĺcť         lčúc       ĺcť
SFX R   ĺcť         lč         ĺcť
SFX R   ĺcť         lčme       ĺcť
SFX R   ĺcť         lčte       ĺcť
SFX R   cť          kol        ĺcť
SFX R   cť          kla        ĺcť
SFX R   cť          klo        ĺcť
SFX R   cť          kli        ĺcť
SFX R   cť          žem        ôcť
SFX R   cť          žeš        ôcť
SFX R   cť          že         ôcť
SFX R   cť          žme        ôcť
SFX R   cť          žeme       ôcť
SFX R   cť          žte        ôcť
SFX R   cť          žete       ôcť
SFX R   cť          žu         ôcť
SFX R   ôcť         ohol       ôcť
SFX R   ôcť         ohla       ôcť
SFX R   ôcť         ohlo       ôcť
SFX R   ôcť         ohli       ôcť
SFX R   edieť       iem        edieť
SFX R   edieť       ieš        edieť
SFX R   edieť       ie         edieť
SFX R   edieť       ieme       edieť
SFX R   edieť       iete       edieť
SFX R   edieť       edia       edieť
SFX R   edieť       ediac      edieť
SFX R   edieť       edz        edieť
SFX R   edieť       edzme      edieť
SFX R   edieť       edzte      edieť
SFX R   edieť       edel       edieť
SFX R   edieť       edela      edieť
SFX R   edieť       edelo      edieť
SFX R   edieť       edeli      edieť
SFX R   lieť        eliem      mlieť
SFX R   lieť        elieš      mlieť
SFX R   lieť        elie       mlieť
SFX R   lieť        elieme     mlieť
SFX R   lieť        eliete     mlieť
SFX R   lieť        elú        mlieť
SFX R   lieť        elúc       mlieť
SFX R   lieť        eľ         mlieť
SFX R   lieť        eľme       mlieť
SFX R   lieť        eľte       mlieť
SFX R   ieť         i          [^m]lieť
SFX R   ieť         ime        [^m]lieť
SFX R   ieť         ite        [^m]lieť
SFX R   ieť         me         [^dlnt]ieť
SFX R   ieť         te         [^dlnt]ieť
SFX R   nieť        ňme        nieť
SFX R   dieť        ďme        dieť
SFX R   tieť        ťme        tieť
SFX R   nieť        ňte        nieť
SFX R   dieť        ďte        dieť
SFX R   tieť        ťte        tieť
SFX R   ieť         ím         ieť
SFX R   ieť         íš         ieť
SFX R   ieť         í          ieť
SFX R   ieť         íme        ieť
SFX R   ieť         íte        ieť
SFX R   ieť         ia         ieť
SFX R   ieť         iac        ieť
SFX R   ieť         el         ieť
SFX R   ieť         ela        ieť
SFX R   ieť         elo        ieť
SFX R   ieť         eli        ieť
SFX R   ásť         adiem      lásť
SFX R   ásť         adieš      lásť
SFX R   ásť         adie       lásť
SFX R   ásť         adieme     lásť
SFX R   ásť         adiete     lásť
SFX R   ásť         adú        lásť
SFX R   ásť         adúc       lásť
SFX R   ásť         ď          lásť
SFX R   ásť         aďme       lásť
SFX R   ásť         aďte       lásť
SFX R   sť          dol        lásť
SFX R   sť          dla        lásť
SFX R   sť          dlo        lásť
SFX R   sť          dli        lásť
SFX R   ásť         asiem      pásť
SFX R   ásť         asieš      pásť
SFX R   ásť         asie       pásť
SFX R   ásť         asieme     pásť
SFX R   ásť         asiete     pásť
SFX R   ásť         asú        pásť
SFX R   ásť         asúc       pásť
SFX R   ásť         s          pásť
SFX R   ásť         asme       pásť
SFX R   ásť         aste       pásť
SFX R   sť          sol        pásť
SFX R   sť          sla        pásť
SFX R   sť          slo        pásť
SFX R   sť          sli        pásť
SFX R   ásť         astiem     [^lp]ásť
SFX R   ásť         astieš     [^lp]ásť
SFX R   ásť         astie      [^lp]ásť
SFX R   ásť         astieme    [^lp]ásť
SFX R   ásť         astiete    [^lp]ásť
SFX R   ásť         astú       [^lp]ásť
SFX R   ásť         astúc      [^lp]ásť
SFX R   ásť         asť        [^lp]ásť
SFX R   ásť         asťme      [^lp]ásť
SFX R   ásť         asťte      [^lp]ásť
SFX R   ť           tol        [^lp]ásť
SFX R   ť           tla        [^lp]ásť
SFX R   ť           tlo        [^lp]ásť
SFX R   ť           tli        [^lp]ásť
SFX R   iasť        ätiem      miasť
SFX R   iasť        ätieš      miasť
SFX R   iasť        ätie       miasť
SFX R   iasť        ätieme     miasť
SFX R   iasť        ätiete     miasť
SFX R   iasť        ätú        miasť
SFX R   iasť        ätúc       miasť
SFX R   iasť        äť         miasť
SFX R   iasť        äťme       miasť
SFX R   iasť        äťte       miasť
SFX R   sť          tol        miasť
SFX R   sť          tla        miasť
SFX R   sť          tlo        miasť
SFX R   sť          tli        miasť
SFX R   iasť        adiem      priasť
SFX R   iasť        adieš      priasť
SFX R   iasť        adie       priasť
SFX R   iasť        adieme     priasť
SFX R   iasť        adiete     priasť
SFX R   iasť        adú        priasť
SFX R   iasť        adúc       priasť
SFX R   iasť        aď         priasť
SFX R   iasť        aďme       priasť
